exercise4/danish.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
        +Indef  ! indefinite form
        +Def    ! definite form
        ! Remember to list all your flag diacritics as multichar symbols, too
        @U.ART.NONE@
        @U.ART.INDEF@
        @U.ART.DEF@
        @U.ADJ.NO@
        @U.ADJ.YES@

LEXICON Root
        Articles ;

LEXICON Articles
@U.ART.NONE@@U.ADJ.NO@        NounStems ;  ! no article
@U.ART.INDEF@:@U.ART.INDEF@et_    AdjStems ;   ! indefinite article (a/an)
@U.ART.DEF@:@U.ART.DEF@det_   AdjStems ;   ! definite article (the)

LEXICON AdjStems
@U.ADJ.NO@        NounStems ;     ! no adjective attribute
@U.ADJ.YES@dejlig  AdjSuffixes ;   ! nice
@U.ADJ.YES@god     AdjSuffixes ;   ! good
@U.ADJ.YES@gul     AdjSuffixes ;   ! yellow
@U.ADJ.YES@ny      AdjSuffixes ;   ! new
@U.ADJ.YES@stor    AdjSuffixes ;   ! big

LEXICON AdjSuffixes
@U.ART.INDEF@t_      NounStems ;     ! indefinite adj. suffix
@U.ART.DEF@t_:@U.ART.DEF@e_   NounStems ;     ! definite adj. suffix

LEXICON NounStems
brev    NounSuffixes ;  ! letter
hegn    NounSuffixes ;  ! fence
fly     NounSuffixes ;  ! plane
hus     NounSuffixes ;  ! house
tog     NounSuffixes ;  ! train

LEXICON NounSuffixes
@U.ART.INDEF@+Indef: # ;             ! no noun suffix                
@U.ART.DEF@@U.ADJ.YES@+Def:@U.ART.DEF@@U.ADJ.YES@ # ;             ! no noun suffix                
@U.ART.NONE@@U.ADJ.NO@+Def:@U.ART.NONE@@U.ADJ.NO@et # ;             ! definite suffix

END
